Louisiana, session 2026, HB616.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:513(Q) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§513. Powers and duties of legislative auditor; audit reports as public records;
assistance and opinions of attorney general; frequency of audits; subpoena
power
* * *
Q. The legislative auditor may review and prepare a report on publicly
funded homeless service providers in accordance with R.S. 40:581 for the purposes
of transparency and ensuring proper utilization of public funds.
Section 2. Part IV of Chapter 3 of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 40:581, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IV. SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS
§581. Oversight of publicly funded homeless service providers
A. Any continuum of care organization or homeless services provider that
receives federal, state, or local public funds shall, upon request of the legislative
auditor or a parish president or a governing body of a municipality providing such
funds, submit to a legislative audit pursuant to R.S. 24:513 and provide the
requesting municipality with detailed documentation regarding:
(1) Program performance metrics, including housing outcomes and service
delivery statistics.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 616 ENROLLED
(2) Effectiveness in achieving stated goals and objectives.
(3) The use and allocation of public funds in an easy-to-read format, such as
a spreadsheet.
B. Failure to comply with the provisions of this Section shall result in the
suspension or termination of public funding, including federal, state, and local funds,
subject to applicable laws and contract provisions.
C. The legislative auditor shall comply with any and all restrictions imposed
by law on documents, data, or information deemed confidential by law and furnished
to the legislative auditor.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.